Utah statutes.
19-3-111.   Impounding of radioactive material.

(1)  The director may impound the radioactive material of any person if:

(a)  the material poses an imminent threat or danger to the public health or safety; or

(b)  that person is violating:

(i)  any provision of Sections 19-3-104 through 19-3-113;

(ii)  any rules or orders enacted or issued under the authority of those sections; or

(iii)  the terms of a license, permit, or registration certificate issued under the authority of those sections.

(2)  Before any dispositive action may be taken with regard to impounded radioactive materials, the director shall comply with the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act and Section 19-1-301.

